California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 873, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11732.5.

Rates shall not be unfairly discriminatory. Rates are unfairly discriminatory if, after allowing for practical limitations, price differentials fail to reflect equitably the difference in expected losses and expenses. A rate of an insurer shall not be deemed unfairly discriminatory because different premiums result for policyholders with like loss exposures but different expenses, or like expenses but different loss exposures, as long as the rate reflects the differences with reasonable accuracy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11733.

In determining whether rates comply with Section 11732, the following criteria shall apply:

(a) Due consideration may be given to past and prospective loss and expenses experience within this state, to catastrophe hazards and contingencies, to events or trends within this state, to loadings for leveling premium rates over time or for dividends or savings to be allowed or returned by insurers to their policyholders, members or subscribers, and to all other relevant factors, including judgment.

(b) The expense provisions included in the rates to be used by an insurer shall reflect the operating methods of the insurer and, so far as is credible, its own actual and anticipated expense experience.

(c) The rates may contain a provision for contingencies and an allowance permitting a reasonable profit. In determining the reasonableness of profit, consideration shall be given to all investment income attributable to premiums and the reserves associated with those premiums.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 873, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11734.

(a) Every workers’ compensation insurer shall adhere to a uniform experience rating plan filed with the commissioner by a rating organization designated by the commissioner and subject to his or her disapproval.

(b) The commissioner shall designate a rating organization to assist him or her in gathering, compiling, and reporting relevant statistical information, and to develop a classification system. An insurer may develop its own classification system upon which a rate may be made or adopt the classification system developed by the designated rating organization; provided, however, that any classification system developed by an insurer must be filed with the commissioner 30 days prior to its use. The commissioner shall disapprove a classification system filed by an insurer pursuant to this section if the insurer fails to demonstrate that the data thereby produced can be reported consistent with the uniform statistical plan or the classification system developed by the rating organization. Every workers’ compensation insurer shall record and report its workers’ compensation experience to the designated rating organization as set forth in the uniform statistical plan approved by the commissioner.

(c) The designated rating organization shall develop and file manual rules, subject to the approval of the commissioner, reasonably related to the recording and reporting of data pursuant to the uniform statistical plan, uniform experience rating plan, and any classification systems that may be in effect. Every workers’ compensation insurer shall adhere to the approved manual rules and experience rating plan in writing and reporting its business. No insurer shall agree with any other insurer or with a rating organization to adhere to manual rules that are not reasonably related to the recording and reporting of data pursuant to the uniform statistical plan or classification system developed by the rating organization.

(d) The designated rating organization shall also develop and file with the commissioner a weekly premium per employee for each classification used or proposed for use by that organization. The weekly premium shall be developed by applying the proposed rate for each classification to the state average weekly wage. For the purpose of this section, “state average weekly wage” means the average weekly wage paid by employers to employees covered by unemployment insurance as reported by the United States Department of Labor for California for the 12 months ending March 31 of the calendar year preceding the year in which the injury occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11735.

(a) Every insurer shall file with the commissioner all rates and supplementary rate information that are to be used in this state. The rates and supplementary rate information shall be filed not later than 30 days prior to the effective date. Upon application by the filer, the commissioner may authorize an earlier effective date. To the extent possible, rates and supplementary rate information shall be based upon supporting information derived from the experience or data of the insurer, rating organization, advisory organization, or other insurers. For the purposes of this subdivision, “rating organization” shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 11750.1, and “advisory organization” shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (e) of that section.

(b) Rates filed pursuant to this section shall be filed in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. All rates, supplementary rate information, and any supporting information for rates filed under this article, as soon as filed, shall be open to public inspection at any reasonable time. Copies may be obtained by any person upon request and the payment of a reasonable charge.

(c) Upon the written application of the insurer and insured, stating its reasons therefor, filed with the commissioner, a rate in excess of that provided by a filing otherwise applicable may be used on any specific risk.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 679.70, no rating organization may issue, nor may any insurer use, any classification system or rate, as applied or used, that violates Section 679.71 or 679.72 or that violates the Unruh Civil Rights Act.

(e) Notwithstanding Sections 11657 to 11660, inclusive, supplementary rate information filed with the commissioner for purposes of offering deductibles to policyholders for all or part of benefits payable under the policy shall be deemed complete if the filing contains all of the following:

(1) A copy of the deductible endorsement that is to be attached to the policy to effectuate deductible coverage.

(2) Endorsement language that protects the rights of injured workers and ensures that benefits are paid by the insurer without regard to any deductible. The endorsement shall specify that the nonpayment of deductible amounts by the policyholder shall not relieve the insurer from the payment of compensation for injuries sustained by the employee during the period of time the endorsed policy was in effect. The endorsement shall provide that deductible policies for workers’ compensation insurance coverage shall not be terminated retroactively for the nonpayment of deductible amounts.

(3) The endorsement shall provide that notwithstanding the deductible, the insurer shall pay all of the obligations of the employer for workers’ compensation benefits for injuries occurring during the policy period. Payment by the insurer of any amounts within the deductible shall be treated as an advancement of funds by the insurer to the employer and shall create a legal obligation for reimbursements, and may be secured by appropriate security.

(4) The endorsement shall specify whether loss adjustment expenses are to be treated as advancements within the deductible to be reimbursed by the employer.

(5) An explanation of premium reductions reflecting the type and level of the deductible shall be clearly set forth for the policyholder.

(6) The filing shall provide that premium reductions for deductibles are determined before application of any experience modification, premium surcharge, or premium discount, and the premium reductions reflect the type and level of deductible consistent with accepted actuarial standards.

(7) The filing shall provide that the nonpayment of deductible amounts by the insured employer to its insurer, or the failure to comply with any security-related terms of the policy, shall be treated under the policy in the same manner as the payment or nonpayment of the premium pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 676.8.

(f) The insurer shall report and record losses subject to the deductible as losses for purposes of ratemaking and application of an experience rating plan on the same basis as losses under policies providing first dollar coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 873, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11736.

An experience rating plan shall contain reasonable eligibility standards, provide adequate incentives for loss prevention, and shall provide for sufficient premium differentials so as to encourage safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 748, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

11736.5.

(a) The commissioner shall establish, by regulation, those forms of collateral or security that an insurer may designate to secure the deductible amount of any policy of workers’ compensation insurance and the establishment of reserves and recognition of receivables for insurers writing workers’ compensation deductible policies.

The commissioner, by order, exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act, shall establish those forms of security or collateral that the insurer may designate to secure the deductible amount of any policy of workers’ compensation insurance that provides for a deductible and the establishment of reserves and recognition of receivables for insurers writing workers’ compensation deductible policies. This authority shall expire if regulations required by subdivision (a) are not drafted and filed with the Office of Administrative Law by December 31, 1995; if the regulations are filed with the Office of Administrative Law by December 31, 1995, this authority shall expire December 31, 1996, or upon filing of the regulations with the Secretary of State, whichever is earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1131, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11737.

(a) The commissioner may disapprove a rate if the insurer fails to comply with the filing requirements under Section 11735.

(b) The commissioner may disapprove rates if the commissioner determines that premiums charged, in the aggregate, resulting from the use of the rates or the rates as modified by any supplementary rate information, would be inadequate to cover an insurer’s losses and expenses, unfairly discriminatory, or tend to create a monopoly in the market pursuant to Section 11732, 11732.5, or 11733.

(c) The commissioner shall disapprove rates if the commissioner determines that premiums charged, in the aggregate, resulting from the use of the rates or the rates as modified by any supplementary rate information would, if continued in use, tend to impair or threaten the solvency of an insurer. In determining whether the premium charged in the aggregate would, if continued in use, tend to impair or threaten the solvency of the insurer, the commissioner shall consider the insurer’s experience in other states.

(d) If the commissioner intends to disapprove rates pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the commissioner shall serve notice on the insurer of the intent to disapprove and shall schedule a hearing to commence within 60 days of the date of the notice.

(e) If the commissioner disapproves rates pursuant to subdivision (c), the commissioner shall immediately serve notice on the insurer of the disapproval. An insurer whose rates have been disapproved pursuant to that subdivision may, within 20 days of the date of the notice of disapproval, request a hearing, and the commissioner shall hold a hearing within 60 days of the date of the notice of disapproval.

(f) Every insurer or rating organization shall provide within this state reasonable means whereby any person aggrieved by the application of its filings may be heard by the insurer or rating organization on written request to review the manner in which the rating system has been applied in connection with the insurance afforded or offered. If the insurer or rating organization fails to grant or reject the request within 30 days, the applicant may proceed in the same manner as if the application had been rejected. Any party affected by the action of the insurer or rating organization on the request may appeal, within 30 days after written notice of the action, to the commissioner who, after a hearing held within 60 days from the date on which the party requests the appeal, or longer upon agreement of the parties and not less than 10 days’ written notice to the appellant and to the insurer or rating organization, may affirm, modify, or reverse that action. If the commissioner has information on the subject from which the appeal is taken and believes that a reasonable basis for the appeal does not exist or that the appeal is not made in good faith, the commissioner may deny the appeal without a hearing. The denial shall be in writing, set forth the basis for the denial, and be served on all parties.

(g) If the commissioner disapproves a rate, the commissioner shall issue an order specifying in what respects the rate fails to meet the requirements of this article and stating when, within a reasonable period thereafter, that rate shall be discontinued for any policy issued or renewed after a date specified in the order. The order shall be issued within 20 days after the notice prescribed in subdivision (e) is served. If a hearing is held pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e), the order shall be issued, instead, within 30 days after the close of the hearing. The order may include a provision for premium adjustment for the period after the effective date of the order for policies in effect on that date.

(h) Whenever an insurer has no legally effective rates as a result of the commissioner’s disapproval of rates or other act, the commissioner shall specify interim rates for the insurer that protect the interests of all parties and may order that a specified portion of the premiums be placed in an escrow account approved by the commissioner. When new rates become legally effective, the commissioner shall order the escrowed funds or any overcharge in the interim rates to be distributed appropriately, except that refunds of less than ten dollars ($10) per policyholder shall not be required. However, if the commissioner has disapproved rates pursuant to subdivision (c), the commissioner shall order the insurer in the interim to use, at a minimum, the approved advisory pure premium rates pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11750, as modified by the uniform experience rating plan established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11734, without any deviations on account of any supplementary rate information and reflecting the actual expenses of the insurer, until the time that a final determination of rates is adjudicated and ordered through a hearing.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an insurer may increase rates on policies with inception dates prior to January 1, 2003, in an amount no greater than the pure premium rate increase approved by the commissioner reflecting the cost of the change in benefit levels authorized by the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 873, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11738.

A classification shall take no account of any physical impairment of employees or the extent to which employees may have persons dependent upon them for support.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 228, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 228, as amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

11739.

(a) An insurer shall not use any plan for the payment of dividends to policyholders by reason of a participating provision in a workers’ compensation insurance policy which is unfairly discriminatory.

(b) Every insurer issuing workers’ compensation insurance policies under the laws of this state shall file annually with the rating organization designated by the commissioner information relating to dividend payments made to its policyholders. Information filed shall be in sufficient detail to permit the rating organization to prepare for the commissioner’s review and approval, a report showing in the aggregate for all companies premiums earned, losses incurred, and dividends paid the preceding calendar year under policies containing a participating provision, separately by premium size and loss ratio categories, as may reasonably be prescribed by the commissioner.

(c) Information submitted by individual companies pursuant to this section shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure under any law of this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 228, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 228, as amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

11740.

Rates and supplementary rate information filed for use in this state pursuant to this article and Article 3 (commencing with Section 11750), as added and amended by Chapter 228 of the Statutes of 1993, shall not be effective prior to the first normal anniversary rating date of a policy on or after January 1, 1995. Rates, any rating plan or plans, and policy forms issued or approved prior to January 1, 1995, shall remain in effect only until the first normal anniversary rating date on or after January 1, 1995, as determined by a licensed rating organization pursuant to rules issued or approved by the commissioner in effect on July 16, 1993. Prior to January 1, 1995, no policy may be issued or renewed for a term of less than one year for the purpose of changing the normal anniversary date of the policy or the preceding policy. No policy may be canceled, amended, or rewritten for the purpose of avoiding this section.

Notwithstanding Section 7 of Chapter 228 of the Statutes of 1993, this section shall become operative January 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1242, Sec. 7.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1994, by its own provisions, notwithstanding the January 1, 1995, operative date of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11730), as added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 228.)
-------------------------------------------

11742.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the insolvencies of more than a dozen workers’ compensation insurance carriers have seriously constricted the market and led to a dangerous increase in business at the State Compensation Insurance Fund. Yet more than 200 insurance companies are still licensed to offer workers’ compensation insurance in California. Unfortunately, many employers do not know which carriers are offering coverage, and it is both difficult and time consuming to try to get information on rates and coverages from competing insurance companies. A central information source would help employers find the required coverage at the best competitive rate.

(b) On or before July 1, 2004, the commissioner shall establish and maintain, on the Internet Web site maintained by the department, an online rate comparison guide showing workers’ compensation insurance rates for the 50 insurance companies writing the highest volume of business in this line during the two preceding years.

(c) The online comparison shall display rates for each class set forth in the classification system adopted by the commissioner pursuant to Section 11734, shall include the effective date of each rate, and shall list the rates for each class from the lowest to the highest rate.

(d) The rating organization designated by the commissioner as his or her statistical agent pursuant to Section 11751.5 shall determine the cost savings achieved in the 2003 workers’ compensation reform legislation. Each insurer shall certify, in the form and manner determined by the commissioner, that its rates reflect those cost savings. The certifications shall be made available to the public on the Internet Web site maintained by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 635, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rating and Other Organizations [11750. - 11759.2.]

11750.

(a) The purpose of this article is to promote the public welfare by regulating concert of action between insurers in collecting and tabulating rating information and other data that may be helpful in the making of adequate pure premium rates for workers’ compensation insurance and for employers liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith for all admitted insurers and in submitting them to the commissioner for approval; to authorize and regulate the existence and cooperation of qualified rating organizations to one of which each workers’ compensation insurer shall belong; to authorize and regulate cooperation between insurers, rating organizations and advisory organizations in ratemaking and other related matters to the end that the purposes of this chapter may be complied with and carried into effect.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, within 60 days of receiving an advisory pure premium rate filing made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11750.3, the Insurance Commissioner shall hold a public hearing, and within 30 days of the conclusion of the hearing, approve, disapprove, or modify the proposed rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11750.1.

As used in this article, unless a different meaning is manifest, the term:

(a) “Insurer” means every insurer authorized to transact workers’ compensation insurance and employer’s liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith in this state, including the State Compensation Insurance Fund;

(b) “Rating organization” means any organization which has as its primary object or purpose the collecting of loss and expense statistics and other statistical information and data, the making of pure premium rates and those rating plans authorized by Section 11734 for workers’ compensation insurance and employer’s liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith and presenting them to the commissioner for approval;

(c) “Insurance” means workers’ compensation insurance and employer’s liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith;

(d) “Willful” or “willfully” in relation to an act or omission which constitutes a violation of this article means with actual knowledge or belief that such act or omission constitutes such violation and with specific intent to commit such violation.

(e) “Advisory organization” means every person, group or organization, other than an insurer, whether located within or without this state, which prepares policy forms or underwriting rules incidental to or in connection with workers’ compensation insurance and employer’s liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith or which collects and furnishes to admitted insurers or rating organizations loss statistics or other statistical information and data relating to workers’ compensation insurance and employer’s liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith and acts in an advisory capacity to such insurers or rating organizations as distinguished from a ratemaking capacity. No duly authorized attorney at law acting in the usual course of his profession shall be deemed to be an advisory organization.

(f) “Employer’s liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith” means insurance of any liability of employers for injuries to, or death of, employees arising out of, and in the course of, employment when this insurance is incidental to, and written in connection with, the workers’ compensation insurance issued to the same employer and covering the same employer interests.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 228) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1242, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Amendments (to currently operative law) by Stats. 1993, Chs. 228 and 1242, are operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 228, as amended by Sec. 43 of Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

11750.2.

The provisions of this article shall apply to all workers’ compensation insurance and employer’s liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith in this state, except reinsurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 300.)
-------------------------------------------

11750.3.

A rating organization may be organized pursuant to this article and maintained in this state for the following purposes:

(a) To provide reliable statistics and rating information with respect to workers’ compensation insurance and employer’s liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith.

(b) To collect and tabulate information and statistics for the purpose of developing pure premium rates to be submitted to the commissioner for issuance or approval.

(c) To formulate rules and regulations in connection with pure premium rates and the administration of classifications and rating systems.

(d) To inspect risks for classification or rate purposes and to furnish to the insurer and upon request of the employer and after notice to the insurer, to furnish to the employer full information concerning the rates applicable to the employer’s insurance.

(e) To examine policies, daily reports, endorsements or other evidences of insurance for the purpose of ascertaining whether they comply with the provisions of law and to make reasonable rules governing their submission. A rating organization may develop loss data on behalf of its members to assist members in developing plans pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11735 and other loss sensitive plans.

(f) Within one year after expiration of any workers’ compensation insurance policy, to initiate test audits of insured employer’s payrolls and insurer’s audits of those payrolls to check the accuracy and reliability thereof, and to examine all records relative thereto and premises of insured employers.

(g) To exchange information and experience data with rating organizations, advisory organizations, and insurers in this and other states, with respect to ratemaking.

(h) To become a member or subscriber of any lawfully authorized ratemaking or advisory organization whenever membership in the organization is necessary or helpful to the rating organization.

(i) To perform all acts necessary, incidental, or convenient to carry out the foregoing purposes or the provisions of this chapter relating to rating organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1131, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.

On and after January 1, 1952, a rating organization shall not conduct its operations in this state without first having filed with the commissioner a written application for and securing a license to act as a rating organization. Any rating organization may make application for and obtain a license as a rating organization if it meets the requirements for license set forth in this article. The fee for filing an application for a license as a rating organization is two hundred twenty-four dollars ($224) payable in advance to the commissioner. Every rating organization shall file with its application:

(a) A copy of its constitution, its articles of incorporation, agreement of association, and of its bylaws, rules and regulations governing the
 conduct of its business, all certified by the custodian of the originals thereof.

(b) A list of its members who shall not number less than five insurers authorized to write and writing workers’ compensation insurance in this state and whose combined experience shall be determined by the commissioner to be reasonably adequate for ratemaking purposes.

(c) The name and address of a resident of this state upon whom notices of the commissioner or process affecting that rating organization may be served.

(d) A statement of its qualifications as a rating organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 71.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.1.

To obtain and retain a license, a rating organization shall provide satisfactory evidence to the commissioner that it shall do all of the following:

(a) Permit any insurer to become a member at a reasonable cost and without discrimination, or to withdraw therefrom.

(b) Neither have nor adopt any rule or exact any agreement, the effect of which would be to require any member as a condition of membership to adhere to any rates.

(c) Neither adopt any rule nor exact any agreement, the effect of which would be to prohibit or regulate the payment of dividends, savings, or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or returned by insurers to their policyholders or members. 

(d) Neither practice nor sanction any plan or act of boycott, coercion, or intimidation.

(e) Neither enter into nor sanction any contract or act by which any person is restrained from lawfully engaging in the insurance business.

(f) Notify the commissioner promptly of every change in its constitution or articles of incorporation, agreement of association, or in its bylaws, rules and regulations governing the conduct of its business; its list of members; and the name and address of the resident of this state designated by it upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process affecting the organization may be served.

(g) Agree that the commissioner or his or her representative may attend all meetings of the organization or any of its committees.

(h) Agree to permit four members of the public, two representing organized labor and two representing insured employers, to serve on the managing or governing committee of the organization as specified in Section 11751.35.

(i) Maintain reasonable records of the experience of its members and of the data, statistics or information collected or used in connection with the pure premium rates, classifications, manual rules, and policy and endorsement forms used by its members so that these records will be available at all reasonable times to enable the commissioner to determine whether the rating organization and its members comply with the provisions of this chapter applicable to them. These records shall be maintained in an office within this state. The commissioner may prescribe a uniform system for the keeping of the records which shall be reasonably adapted to the rating organization and its members’ method of operation and which shall be applicable to all rating organizations licensed under this article and their members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 228, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 228.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.2.

The commissioner shall examine each application for license to act as a rating organization and the documents filed therewith and may make any further investigation of the applicant, its affairs and its proposed plan of business, as he deems desirable.

The commissioner shall issue the license applied for within 60 days of its filing with him if from such examination and investigation he is satisfied that:

a. The business reputation of the applicant and its officers is good.

b. The facilities of the applicant are adequate to enable it to furnish the services it proposes to furnish.

c. The applicant and its proposed plan of operation conform to the requirements of this chapter.

Otherwise, but only after hearing upon notice, the commissioner shall in writing deny the application and notify the applicant of his decision and his reasons therefor.

Licenses issued pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until suspended or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.25.

Notwithstanding Section 11751, each rating organization possessing a license of indefinite term pursuant to this article shall owe and pay to the commissioner an annual fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150), in advance, on account of that license until its final termination. That fee shall be for annual periods commencing on July 1 of each year and ending on June 30 of each year and shall be due and payable on each March 1 and shall be delinquent on and after each April 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 72.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.3.

(a) Subject to the approval of the commissioner, a rating organization licensed under this article may adopt any reasonable constitution, articles of incorporation, or agreement of association, and may make reasonable rules for the regulation of its members and the conduct of its business by bylaws or otherwise. In a rating organization of which the State Compensation Insurance Fund is a member, it shall be entitled without election to membership on the managing or governing committee and on the classification and rating committee thereof. 

(b) In addition, after consultation with the California Labor Federation, AFL-CIO, other statewide organized labor organizations, and statewide associations representing business, the commissioner shall appoint two public members representing insured employers and two public members representing organized labor to serve on the managing or governing committee of a rating organization. The bylaws of a rating organization shall permit a public member from time to time to designate in his or her stead a representative from the same employer organization or an affiliated employee union, as the case may be, to attend and participate in any meeting of the governing committee of a rating organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 892, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.35.

(a) Four members of the public, two representing organized labor and two representing insured employers, appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11751.3, shall be entitled to serve on the managing or governing committee of a rating organization licensed under this article. A public member shall be entitled to vote on all issues involving pure premium rates, classifications, rating plans, rating systems, manual rules and policy, and endorsement forms which are properly brought before the committee. A public member shall be removed by the commissioner only for cause.

(b) In the event a public member is unable or unwilling to complete his or her term, after consultation with the California Labor Federation, AFL-CIO, other statewide organized labor organizations, and statewide organizations representing business, as the case may be, the commissioner shall appoint a successor from organized labor or an insured employer to complete the unexpired term.

(c) The public members who serve on the governing committee of a rating organization licensed under this article together may, by a majority vote, retain experts who shall include a fellow of the Casualty Actuarial Society, to advise them on any matter specified in subdivision (a). The actuary hired may participate in all proceedings of the actuarial committee of the rating organization. The reasonable expense of retaining these experts shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year and shall be paid from the budget of the department. The commissioner shall increase this amount annually to reflect any needed cost-of-living adjustments. The public members may submit information obtained from these experts, as well as any other information they deem appropriate, to the commissioner for his or her consideration in approving a change of any matter specified in subdivision (a).

(d) In addition to the expenses authorized pursuant to subdivision (c), the public members who serve on the governing committee of a rating organization licensed under this article may expend up to an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year, which shall be paid by insurer members of the rating organization. Those funds shall be used to retain staff, who shall be hired by a majority vote of the public members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 375, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.4.

From and after the taking effect of this act, it shall be the duty of every insurer to be a member of a rating organization. No insurer may at the same time belong to more than one rating organization licensed under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.5.

The commissioner, after notice and hearing, may promulgate reasonable rules and statistical plans, which may be modified from time to time and which shall be used thereafter in the recording and reporting by insurers of their loss and expense experience in order that the experiences of all insurers may be made available in such form and detail as may be necessary to aid the commissioner in administering the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11730). The commissioner shall designate a rating organization licensed under this article as his or her statistical agent to gather and compile such experience statistics and all licensed rating organizations shall report the experience of their members to such designated rating organization. Subject to reasonable rules approved by the commissioner, such designated rating organization shall make such experience statistics, when compiled, available to all licensed rating organizations and may make a reasonable charge to other rating organizations for the expense incurred by it in combining, tabulating and compiling the experience of all workers’ compensation insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1242, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.55.

If an insurer, the State Compensation Insurance Fund, a rating organization, or an advisory organization requests an official action by the commissioner under Chapters 2 (commencing with Section 11630), 3 (commencing with Section 11690), or 4 (commencing with Section 11770) of this part which he can lawfully consummate only after a noticed public hearing required by law, the commissioner shall require the request to be in writing and require the payment of five hundred ninety dollars ($590), in advance, as a fee for filing such request. Such fee shall be earned even if the request is denied or is granted in an altered form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 770, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.7.
